Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 28.2-1500.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Beach”
shall have the same meaning ascribed thereto in subsection A of §

28.2-1400

.

“Initial inventory”
means a set of maps prepared by, at the direction of, or with the approval of the Commission which have been filed prior to January 1, 1995, with the clerk of the circuit court and the commissioner of revenue in any county in that portion of the Commonwealth separated from the larger portion of the Commonwealth by the Chesapeake Bay and in which the ungranted shores of the sea, marsh and meadowlands mapped therein are located.

“Inventory”
means a set of maps prepared by, at the direction of, or with the approval of the Commission, mapping certain ungranted shores of the sea, marsh and meadowlands in any county in that portion of the Commonwealth separated from the larger portion of the Commonwealth by the Chesapeake Bay.

“Marsh”
or

“meadowland”

shall have the same meaning ascribed to vegetated wetlands in §

28.2-1300

.

“Shores of the sea”
means a beach or any unvegetated lands lying contiguous to mean low water and between mean low water and mean high water.

“Ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands”
means (i) shores of the sea which were not conveyed by special grant or compact according to law prior to April 1, 1873, and which have not been conveyed by special grant of the General Assembly on or after that date and (ii) marsh or meadowlands which were not appropriated and remained ungranted prior to February 24, 1888, and which have not been conveyed by special grant of the General Assembly on or after that date.

“Virginia Coastal Land Management Advisory Council”
or

“Council”

means the Virginia Coastal Land Management Advisory Council created pursuant to §

28.2-1505

.

History.

1995, c. 850.

§ 28.2-1501.
Powers and duties of Commission.

The Commission may receive gifts, grants, bequests, and devises of shores of the sea, marsh, meadowlands, and money which shall be held for the uses prescribed by the donor, grantor, or testator in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The Commission shall manage any shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands it receives as prescribed in Article 2 (§

28.2-1503

et seq.) of this chapter.

The Commission may promulgate regulations and guidelines necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1995, c. 850.

§ 28.2-1502.
Ownership of ungranted shores of the sea, marsh and meadowlands.

All ungranted shores of the sea, marsh and meadowlands shall remain the property of the Commonwealth. Such ungranted marsh and meadowlands which have been used as a commons by the people of the Commonwealth shall continue as a commons for the purpose of fishing, fowling, hunting, and the taking and catching of oysters and other shellfish. All ungranted shores of the sea may be used as a commons for the purpose of fishing, fowling, hunting, and the taking and catching of oysters and other shellfish. The Commission shall manage all ungranted shores of the sea, marsh and meadowlands as provided in Article 2 (§

28.2-1503

et seq.) of this chapter.

History.

1995, c. 850.